Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.030

Emergency school closures exempt from RCW 28A.335.020.

A school district may close a school for emergency reasons, as set forth in RCW 28A.150.290(2) (a) and (b), without complying with the requirements of RCW 28A.335.020.

[ 1990 c 33 s 353; 1983 c 109 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.032.]